District of Columbia statutes.
31-3604

Group policies issued in other states.

No group long-term care insurance coverage may be offered to a resident of the District of Columbia under a group policy issued in another state to a group described in § 31-3601(4)(D), unless the District of Columbia, or another state having statutory and regulatory long-term care insurance requirements substantially similar to those adopted in the District of Columbia has made a determination that such requirements have been met.

May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-121, § 5, 47 DCR 2038